Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-123.10
Farm winery license; when issued.

A license to operate a farm winery may be issued by the commission upon an applicant's compliance with section 53-123.12 and such other requirements as the commission adopts and promulgates by rule and regulation to administer sections 53-101.02 and 53-123.10 to 53-123.13.

Laws 1985, LB 279, § 4.